Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 9. Commerce and Trade

Executive Order No. 9-1
(No. 100-91) [Vermont-Karelia Sister State Relationship.

WHEREAS, the State of Vermont (hereinafter “Vermont”) has initiated efforts to promote personal ties of friendship and commercial relations between Vermont and the Karelian Autonomous Republic (hereinafter “Karelia”), and

WHEREAS, Vermont recognizes the profound differences in the histories, societies and governments of Vermont and Karelia, and desires to achieve a more peaceful world through greater dialogue and understanding among people of different countries, and

WHEREAS, an Agreement to encourage and develop personal ties and commercial relations between Vermont and Karelia (hereafter “the Vermont-Karelia Agreement,” a copy of which is attached hereto), was executed by Madeleine M. Kunin, Governor of Vermont
and Kuzma F. Filatov, former President of Karelia, on September 9, 1989,

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Madeleine M. Kunin, Governor of the State of Vermont, by virtue of the authority vested in me by the Constitution and the statutes of this state, do hereby direct that:

A “Sister State Relationship” is formally established by Resolution J.R.H. #129 adopted by the General Assembly in 1990 (a copy of which is attached hereto) between the State of Vermont of the United States of America and the Karelian Autonomous Soviet
Socialist Republic of the Union of Soviet Socialist Republics to implement the Vermont-Karelia Agreement.

The Sister State Relationship shall exist to encourage and develop official and unofficial exchanges, contacts, and joint projects in the fields of agriculture, child care, culture and performing arts, education, environment, forestry, health care, information
and journalism, language, law, legislation, sports, tourism, and other areas.

A Sister State Advisory Group shall be established to develop and carry out the exchanges, contacts, and joint projects resulting from them.

The Sister State Advisory Group shall be appointed by the Governor, and shall consist of fifteen members including two representatives from the General Assembly, three representatives from State agencies, departments or boards, one member from the Governor’s
Office, and nine representatives from the private sector. Members shall be chosen on the basis of their interest in and special expertise with respect to the exchanges, contacts, and projects developed to implement the Vermont-Karelia
Agreement.

The duties of the Sister State Advisory Group shall be:

To encourage and promote exchanges, contacts, and joint projects between Vermont and Karelia.

To hold regular meetings and to review and collaborate on any exchanges, contacts, and joint projects in which the members are involved or interested.

To seek private funding for the Sister State Relationship.

To advise and report annually to the Governor and the General Assembly on matters relating to the Sister State.

(6)
The representatives from State agencies and departments shall provide administrative support and make available the resources of their agencies and departments by providing volunteers and in kind contributions.

(7)
This order shall take effect immediately.

Dated January 7, 1991.

JOINT STATEMENT OF INTENTIONS

At the invitation of Governor Madeleine M. Kunin, the Chairman of the Presidium of the Supreme Soviet Kuzma F. Filatov and a delegation from the Karelian Autonomous Soviet Socialist Republic of the USSR visited the State of Vermont, of the United States
of America, from the 5th to the 9th of September, 1989.

Included in the delegation were the First Deputy Chairman of the Council of Ministers Lenian P. Kitsa, the Vice Chairman of the Presidium of the Supreme Soviet Vladislav V. Petukhov, Deputy Education Minister Valentina P. Makara and Vladimir G. Prozorov,
chief of the English faculty of the Karelian Pedagogical Institute and interpreter of the delegation.

The delegation’s visit was in return for the visit of Governor Kunin and a delegation from the State of Vermont to the Karelian Autonomous Soviet Socialist Republic, November 27-December 1, 1988.

Chairman of the Presidium Filatov and the Karelian delegation visited Montpelier September 6, conferred with members of the Legislature, inspected a variety of industries, educational and health establishments and acquainted themselves with daily life
in Vermont.

The visit of the Soviet guests reinforced the conviction of both sides that a new constructive dialogue and openness is developing in relations between the United States of America and the Union of Soviet Socialist Republics as a result of the decision
of President Ronald Reagan and General Secretary Mikhail S. Gorbachev at their 1985 summit meeting to encourage people-to-people exchanges.

Both sides confirmed their desire to encourage friendly ties, develop contacts between counterpart organizations and institutions, and encourage businesslike relations between the Karelian Autonomous Soviet Socialist Republic and the State of Vermont
on the basis of equality and mutual benefit.

Both sides, recognizing differences in their historic development, express their desire to enter into greater dialogue and mutual understanding in the interest of peace.

Both sides jointly declared that a state of friendship exists, in practice, between the State of Vermont and the Karelian Autonomous Soviet Socialist Republic, and that a foundation has been laid for the creation of sister-state relations between the
State of Vermont and the Karelian Autonomous Soviet Socialist Republic.

Both sides agreed to encourage and develop exchanges, official as well as unofficial, between the Republic and the State. These would involve short-term exchanges of citizens, teachers, students, local and state officials and others.

Click to view

Display Image IMAGE

Executive Order No. 9-2
(No. 12-12) [Vermont State Craft Center Overview Commission.

WHEREAS, an Executive Order was promulgated on June 16, 1993 to create a Vermont State Craft Center Overview Commission (Commission) to administer an official State Craft Center designation process to promote crafts throughout Vermont and to ensure that
all State Craft Centers represent the State in the best possible manner; and

WHEREAS, a vital system of state craft centers that encourages broader participation in crafts and raises the visibility of Vermont craft artists is important to the development of this component of Vermont’s community and to the crafts community.

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Peter Shumlin, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby reconstitute a Vermont State Craft Center Overview Commission whose composition and duties shall be as follows:

Composition.

The Commission shall be comprised of:

— The Secretary of Commerce and Community Development, or designee,

— The Commissioner of Tourism and Marketing, or designee,

— The Commissioner of Economic, Housing, and Community Development, or designee,

— The Secretary of Agriculture, or designee,

— The State’s Chief Marketing Officer, and

— A representative of the crafts community designated by the Vermont Crafts Council who shall serve a three-year term.

The Chair of the Commission shall be the State’s Chief Marketing Officer. The Commission shall meet as needed to consider recommendations for State Craft Center designation, but not less than annually.

Administrative support for the Commission and the Standards Group described below shall be provided by the Agency of Commerce and Community Development.

Commission Charge.

The Commission shall oversee the formation and operation of a Standards Group that shall be a self-governed entity elected and administered by the Vermont crafts community for the purpose of developing the criteria for and governing State Craft Center
designation. The Commission’s oversight of the Standards Group shall include providing review and approval of the processes governing designation, termination, and appeals of the same based on recommendations from the Standards
Group.

The Commission shall ensure that all State Craft Centers represent the State in the best possible manner through application of the criteria in Attachment #1 and Attachment #2. The Commission shall also afford due recognition to the diversity that exists
within the crafts community in Vermont.

The composition and responsibilities of the Standards Group shall be as follows:

A.
The Standards Group shall be advisory to the Commission and shall be established, governed, and regulated by the crafts community in Vermont.

B.
The Standards Group shall be composed of not more than seven voting members from the crafts community, to be selected by the crafts community through a nomination and election process administered by the Vermont
Crafts Council. The members of the Standards Group shall serve a term of three years, except that the Standards Group shall consist of two members serving one-year terms, two members serving two-year terms, and three members
serving three-year terms so that the terms will be staggered. Standards Group members may succeed themselves indefinitely. Pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 1010(e)
, members of the Standards Group shall be reimbursed for reasonable expenses incurred in performance of their functions to the extent funds are available.

C.
The Standards Group will both determine and perform functions related to State Craft Center and State Craft Education Center designation, including the application process for designation, and annual review of
designations. The Standards Group will make a recommendation to the Commission on whether to approve or deny an application for designation.

Effective Date.

This Order shall take effect upon signing and supersedes and replaces Executive Order 09-09 (codified as No. 3-49). Members of the Commission and the Standards Group on the effective date of this order shall continue to serve until their successors are
appointed.

Dated October 31, 2012.

Attachment #1

CRITERIA FOR STATE CRAFT CENTER AND STATE CRAFT EDUCATION CENTER DESIGNATION AND OPERATION

Criteria for designation and operation of a State Craft Center and State Craft Education Center will be determined by the Standards Group and approved by the Craft Center Overview Commission. These criteria shall include, but not be limited to:

Marketing and Branding Criteria:
Every designated Vermont State Craft Center and Vermont State Craft Education Center will utilize marketing material consistent with the branding of the State, to be monitored by the Chief Marketing Officer
(CMO). The State CMO will approve the development and use of official Vermont State Craft Center Designation marketing materials such as signage or logo.

General Criteria:
Whether primarily devoted to hands-on education or to exhibition, the primary underlying criteria for designation as a Vermont State Craft Center shall be high quality and authenticity of (1) educational programs,
and (2) Vermont craftwork.

Educational Criteria:
A Vermont State Craft Education Center will provide comprehensive craft education taught by acknowledged professionals, will offer exhibition opportunities for work by students and faculty, and will maintain
a commitment to the criteria established by the Standards Group.

Exhibition Criteria:
Vermont State Craft Centers will exhibit a high percentage (80% or greater) of original, high-quality, Vermont-made craftwork, will offer various approaches of educating the public about craft, and will maintain
a commitment to the criteria established by the Standards Group.

Legal and Fiscal Criteria:

Governance Criteria:

Operational Criteria:

Attachment #2

STATE CRAFT CENTER AND STATE CRAFT EDUCATION CENTER DESIGNATION REVIEW PROCEDURE

Application review procedure, to be determined by the Standards Group, will include:

New applicants will file a narrative report on their ability to meet the criteria for designation as set by the Standards Group in accordance with Attachment #1.

Existing designees will submit, prior to the review date, documentation required by the Standards Group.

The Standards Group may conduct an on-site visit and community hearing. It shall have access to the records of an applicant for designation or renewal related to matters including the applicant’s operation, education offerings, and governance policies
and procedures. These requirements will be set by the Standards Group.

The Standards Group will provide a summary of its findings to the craft center or craft education center within thirty days of the meeting.

The Standards Group will develop processes pertaining to an application for designation, termination, and appeals and recommend them to the Overview Commission for approval. No designations will be made until the Overview Commission has approved processes
for designation, termination and appeals.

Term of Designation:

1.
Upon favorable review of a renewal application, the designation will be extended for a three-year term, with annual review. The initial term shall be two years.

2.
The Chief Marketing Officer will represent the State in designation agreements.